dictionaries/ka_GE.aff
FLAG long
SFX QW Y 6
SFX QW 0       ი/&x1W         .
SFX QW 0       ი/&x0W         .
SFX QW 0       ა/&x0W         .
SFX QW 0       ით/&x1W        .
SFX QW 0       ით/&x0W        .
SFX QW 0       იან/&x0W       .
  
SFX Qw Y 6
SFX Qw 0       ი/&x1w         .
SFX Qw 0       ი/&x0w         .
SFX Qw 0       ა/&x0w         .
SFX Qw 0       ით/&x1w        .
SFX Qw 0       ით/&x0w        .
SFX Qw 0       იან/&x0w       .
  
SFX Qn Y 6
SFX Qn 0       ი/&x1n         .
SFX Qn 0       ი/&x0n         .
SFX Qn 0       ა/&x0n         .
SFX Qn 0       ით/&x1n        .
SFX Qn 0       ით/&x0n        .
SFX Qn 0       იან/&x0n       .
  
SFX QN Y 6
SFX QN 0       ი/&x1N         .
SFX QN 0       ი/&x0N         .
SFX QN 0       ა/&x0N         .
SFX QN 0       ით/&x1N        .
SFX QN 0       ით/&x0N        .
SFX QN 0       იან/&x0N       .
  


##########################################
# Imperfect, Conditional and Subjunctive #
##########################################



SFX II Y 11
SFX II 0       დი/&x1I         .
SFX II 0       დი/&x0I         .
SFX II 0       და/&x0I         .
SFX II 0       დით/&x1I        .
SFX II 0       დით/&x0I        .
SFX II 0       დნენ/&x0I       .
SFX II 0       დე/&x1I         . # Subjunctive 
SFX II 0       დე/&x0I         .
SFX II 0       დეს/&x0I        .
SFX II 0       დეთ/&x1I        .
SFX II 0       დეთ/&x0I        .
# ოდნენ
  
SFX Io Y 11
SFX Io 0       დი/&x1o         .
SFX Io 0       დი/&x0o         .
SFX Io 0       და/&x0o         .
SFX Io 0       დით/&x1o        .
SFX Io 0       დით/&x0o        .
SFX Io 0       დნენ/&x0o       .
SFX Io 0       დე/&x1o         . # Subjunctive 
SFX Io 0       დე/&x0o         .
SFX Io 0       დეს/&x0o        .
SFX Io 0       დეთ/&x1o        .
SFX Io 0       დეთ/&x0o        .
# ოდნენ
  
SFX IA Y 11
SFX IA 0       დი/&x1A         .
SFX IA 0       დი/&x0A         .
SFX IA 0       და/&x0A         .
SFX IA 0       დით/&x1A        .
SFX IA 0       დით/&x0A        .
SFX IA 0       დნენ/&x0A       .
SFX IA 0       დე/&x1A         . # Subjunctive 
SFX IA 0       დე/&x0A         .
SFX IA 0       დეს/&x0A        .
SFX IA 0       დეთ/&x1A        .
SFX IA 0       დეთ/&x0A        .
# ოდნენ
  
SFX IC Y 11
SFX IC 0       დი/&x1C         .
SFX IC 0       დი/&x0C         .
SFX IC 0       და/&x0C         .
SFX IC 0       დით/&x1C        .
SFX IC 0       დით/&x0C        .
SFX IC 0       დნენ/&x0C       .
SFX IC 0       დე/&x1C         . # Subjunctive 
SFX IC 0       დე/&x0C         .
SFX IC 0       დეს/&x0C        .
SFX IC 0       დეთ/&x1C        .
SFX IC 0       დეთ/&x0C        .
# ოდნენ
  
SFX Ia Y 11
SFX Ia 0       დი/&x1a         .
SFX Ia 0       დი/&x0a         .
SFX Ia 0       და/&x0a         .
SFX Ia 0       დით/&x1a        .
SFX Ia 0       დით/&x0a        .
SFX Ia 0       დნენ/&x0a       .
SFX Ia 0       დე/&x1a         . # Subjunctive 
SFX Ia 0       დე/&x0a         .
SFX Ia 0       დეს/&x0a        .
SFX Ia 0       დეთ/&x1a        .
SFX Ia 0       დეთ/&x0a        .
# ოდნენ
  
SFX Ic Y 11
SFX Ic 0       დი/&x1c         .
SFX Ic 0       დი/&x0c         .
SFX Ic 0       და/&x0c         .
SFX Ic 0       დით/&x1c        .
SFX Ic 0       დით/&x0c        .
SFX Ic 0       დნენ/&x0c       .
SFX Ic 0       დე/&x1c         . # Subjunctive 
SFX Ic 0       დე/&x0c         .
SFX Ic 0       დეს/&x0c        .
SFX Ic 0       დეთ/&x1c        .
SFX Ic 0       დეთ/&x0c        .
# ოდნენ
  
SFX IE Y 11
SFX IE 0       დი/&x1E         .
SFX IE 0       დი/&x0E         .
SFX IE 0       და/&x0E         .
SFX IE 0       დით/&x1E        .
SFX IE 0       დით/&x0E        .
SFX IE 0       დნენ/&x0E       .
SFX IE 0       დე/&x1E         . # Subjunctive 
SFX IE 0       დე/&x0E         .
SFX IE 0       დეს/&x0E        .
SFX IE 0       დეთ/&x1E        .
SFX IE 0       დეთ/&x0E        .
# ოდნენ
  
SFX IG Y 11
SFX IG 0       დი/&x1G         .
SFX IG 0       დი/&x0G         .
SFX IG 0       და/&x0G         .
SFX IG 0       დით/&x1G        .
SFX IG 0       დით/&x0G        .
SFX IG 0       დნენ/&x0G       .
SFX IG 0       დე/&x1G         . # Subjunctive 
SFX IG 0       დე/&x0G         .
SFX IG 0       დეს/&x0G        .
SFX IG 0       დეთ/&x1G        .
SFX IG 0       დეთ/&x0G        .
# ოდნენ
  
SFX Ie Y 11
SFX Ie 0       დი/&x1e         .
SFX Ie 0       დი/&x0e         .
SFX Ie 0       და/&x0e         .
SFX Ie 0       დით/&x1e        .
SFX Ie 0       დით/&x0e        .
SFX Ie 0       დნენ/&x0e       .
SFX Ie 0       დე/&x1e         . # Subjunctive 
SFX Ie 0       დე/&x0e         .
SFX Ie 0       დეს/&x0e        .
SFX Ie 0       დეთ/&x1e        .
SFX Ie 0       დეთ/&x0e        .
# ოდნენ
  
SFX Ig Y 11
SFX Ig 0       დი/&x1g         .
SFX Ig 0       დი/&x0g         .
SFX Ig 0       და/&x0g         .
SFX Ig 0       დით/&x1g        .
SFX Ig 0       დით/&x0g        .
SFX Ig 0       დნენ/&x0g       .
SFX Ig 0       დე/&x1g         . # Subjunctive 
SFX Ig 0       დე/&x0g         .
SFX Ig 0       დეს/&x0g        .
SFX Ig 0       დეთ/&x1g        .
SFX Ig 0       დეთ/&x0g        .
# ოდნენ
  
SFX IX Y 11
SFX IX 0       დი/&x1X         .
SFX IX 0       დი/&x0X         .
SFX IX 0       და/&x0X         .
SFX IX 0       დით/&x1X        .
SFX IX 0       დით/&x0X        .
SFX IX 0       დნენ/&x0X       .
SFX IX 0       დე/&x1X         . # Subjunctive 
SFX IX 0       დე/&x0X         .
SFX IX 0       დეს/&x0X        .
SFX IX 0       დეთ/&x1X        .
SFX IX 0       დეთ/&x0X        .
# ოდნენ
  
SFX Ix Y 11
SFX Ix 0       დი/&x1x         .
SFX Ix 0       დი/&x0x         .
SFX Ix 0       და/&x0x         .
SFX Ix 0       დით/&x1x        .
SFX Ix 0       დით/&x0x        .
SFX Ix 0       დნენ/&x0x       .
SFX Ix 0       დე/&x1x         . # Subjunctive 
SFX Ix 0       დე/&x0x         .
SFX Ix 0       დეს/&x0x        .
SFX Ix 0       დეთ/&x1x        .
SFX Ix 0       დეთ/&x0x        .
# ოდნენ
  
SFX IW Y 11
SFX IW 0       დი/&x1W         .
SFX IW 0       დი/&x0W         .
SFX IW 0       და/&x0W         .
SFX IW 0       დით/&x1W        .
SFX IW 0       დით/&x0W        .
SFX IW 0       დნენ/&x0W       .
SFX IW 0       დე/&x1W         . # Subjunctive 
SFX IW 0       დე/&x0W         .
SFX IW 0       დეს/&x0W        .
SFX IW 0       დეთ/&x1W        .
SFX IW 0       დეთ/&x0W        .
# ოდნენ
  
SFX Iw Y 11
SFX Iw 0       დი/&x1w         .
SFX Iw 0       დი/&x0w         .
SFX Iw 0       და/&x0w         .
SFX Iw 0       დით/&x1w        .
SFX Iw 0       დით/&x0w        .
SFX Iw 0       დნენ/&x0w       .
SFX Iw 0       დე/&x1w         . # Subjunctive 
SFX Iw 0       დე/&x0w         .
SFX Iw 0       დეს/&x0w        .
SFX Iw 0       დეთ/&x1w        .
SFX Iw 0       დეთ/&x0w        .
# ოდნენ
  
SFX In Y 11
SFX In 0       დი/&x1n         .
SFX In 0       დი/&x0n         .
SFX In 0       და/&x0n         .
SFX In 0       დით/&x1n        .
SFX In 0       დით/&x0n        .
SFX In 0       დნენ/&x0n       .
SFX In 0       დე/&x1n         . # Subjunctive 
SFX In 0       დე/&x0n         .
SFX In 0       დეს/&x0n        .
SFX In 0       დეთ/&x1n        .
SFX In 0       დეთ/&x0n        .
# ოდნენ
  
SFX IN Y 11
SFX IN 0       დი/&x1N         .
SFX IN 0       დი/&x0N         .
SFX IN 0       და/&x0N         .
SFX IN 0       დით/&x1N        .
SFX IN 0       დით/&x0N        .
SFX IN 0       დნენ/&x0N       .
SFX IN 0       დე/&x1N         . # Subjunctive 
SFX IN 0       დე/&x0N         .
SFX IN 0       დეს/&x0N        .
SFX IN 0       დეთ/&x1N        .
SFX IN 0       დეთ/&x0N        .
# ოდნენ
  



SFX JI Y 11
SFX JI 0       ოდი/&x1I         .
SFX JI 0       ოდი/&x0I         .
SFX JI 0       ოდა/&x0I         .
SFX JI 0       ოდით/&x1I        .
SFX JI 0       ოდით/&x0I        .
SFX JI 0       ოდნენ/&x0I       .
SFX JI 0       ოდე/&x1I         . # Subjunctive
SFX JI 0       ოდე/&x0I         .
SFX JI 0       ოდეს/&x0I         .
SFX JI 0       ოდეთ/&x1I        .
SFX JI 0       ოდეთ/&x0I        .
# ოდნენ
  
