dictionaries/ka_GE.dic
აგებ/IN
აგროვებ/INPN
ადი/NSNNINTN
აკვირ/In&v
აკვირდებ/JNQN&v
ამბობ/INPN
ამზა/IoIn&v
ამშვი/In&v
აპირებ/InINPN
არი/NSNNIGTN
არსებობ/INPN
ასწავლი/INPN
ატყობ/IN
აშორებ/IN&v
აცა/In&v
აცივ/IC&v
აცქერ/In&v
აცხა/Ig&v
აძოვებ/IN&v
აწ/JIOn
აწყ/IWOoOGOXAoaoko&v
აწყდებ/QWQN&v
აჭმევ/INPN
ახლ/IN
ახსენ/IGOoOEONAoaoko
ბარგ/IX&v
ბე/NSNNIG
ბერ/In
ბრაზ/IG&v
ბრუნ/IIIoIEIGIeIgIn&v
ბრძან/IoONANaNkN
ბრძანდებ/QN&v
გავ/IN&v
გიჟ/IG
გროვ/IoIE&v
გრძნობ/INPN
გულისხმობ/INPN
დი/NPJIJoJAJGJnONTcANaNkN
დიდდებ/QN&v
დუმ/In&v
ებმებ/QN&v
ეგუებ/QN&v
ედავებ/QN&v
ევედრებ/JNQN&v
ეზიარებ/QN&v
ეზიდებ/QN&v
ეთანხმებ/QnQN&v
ეთაყვანებ/QN&v
ეკი/IoIGIg
ელაპარაკებ/JNQN&v
ელევ/QN&v
ელოდებ/QnQN&v
ემალებ/QN&v
ემზა/Io&v
ემზადებ/QN&v
ემორჩილებ/QN&v
ემსახურებ/JNQN&v
ემსგავსებ/QN&v
ემხრობ/QN&v
ენათესავებ/QN&v
ეპუებ/QN&v
ეპყრობ/QN&v
ერთიანდებ/QN&v
ერი/NPNSNNIoOoOC
ერკვევ/QN&v
ესაუბრებ/QN&v
ესწრებ/QnQN&v
ეუფლებ/QN&v
ეფიცებ/QN&v
ექცევ/QN&v
ეყრდნობ/QnQN&v
ეშვებ/QN&v
ეჩვენებ/QN&v
ეცა/IEIN
ეცემ/QN&v
ეძიებ/INPN
ეძლევ/QN&v
ეწევ/QN&v
ეწინააღმდეგებ/QN&v
ეჭვ/In
ეხებ/QN&v
ეხეტებ/Qn&v
ეხვეწებ/QN&v
ეხმარებ/QnQN&v
ეჯახებ/QN&v
ვარ/ICIcIGIX
ვარდებ/QN&v
ვითარდებ/QN&v
ვლი/IN&v
ზ/QN&v
ზარ/IG
ზრახვი/NPNSIN&v
თავ/IG
თამამ/IG
თანხმ/IEIn&v
თბებ/QN&v
თვლი/NPIN
თვრებ/QN&v
იარებ/Qn&v
იბა/In&v
იდევნებ/QN&v
იდენ/IC&v
იზამ/INPN
იზარ/IG&v
იზრდებ/QN&v
ითვლებ/QN&v
იკარგებ/QN&v
იკვებებ/QN&v
იკი/IAIXIW&v
იკრიბებ/QN&v
ილექებ/QN&v
ილოცვი/IN&v
იმალებ/JNQN&v
იმართლებ/IN
იმოქმე/IN&v
იმტვრევ/Qn&v
იმღერ/INONANaNkN
იმყოფებ/QN&v
ინტერეს/In
იპოვ/QNOoONoNAoaoko&v
იპოვი/NSNNIN
ირევ/QN&v
ისარგებლებ/IN&v
ისყი/Ig&v
ისხ/INBEaEkEBnankn&v
იტანჯებ/JNQn&v
იფიქრებ/INPN
იქნევ/IN&v
იღლებ/QN&v
იღუპებ/JnQnQN&v
იყი/IN
იყიდ/INON&v
იშლებ/QN&v
იშოვი/IN&v
იცა/Io
იძირებ/QN&v
იძლევ/QN&v
იძრებ/Qn&v
იჭყიტებ/JNQN&v
იხა/IoIGIX&v
იხე/IIIoIGIX&v
იხედებ/QN&v
იხოცებ/QN&v
იჯ/IN
კვ/Io
კი/NSNNIoIc
კითხულობ/INPN
კმაყოფილ/In
კმაყოფილდებ/QN&v
ლაპარაკ/IA&v
ლაპარაკობ/INPN
ლღვებ/QN&v
მარცხ/In
მაღლდებ/QN&v
მგზავრობ/INPN
მოგზაურობ/INPN
მონაწილეობ/INPN
მორჩილ/In
მოქმედებ/IN
მუშაობ/INPN
მშვიდ/In
მხედრ/IA&v
მხნევ/IG&v
ნატრობ/INPN
ნაყრ/In&v
ნებდებ/Qn&v
პირ/IE
რბ/JIJGJn&v
რჩებ/JXJNQN&v
რწმუნ/In&v
რწმუნდებ/QnQN&v
სარგებლობ/INPN
საუბრობ/INPN
საფრ/IC
სახლ/In
სთვლი/IN&v
სკ/IG&v
სრულ/IE
სუსტდებ/Qn&v
სუფევ/IN&v
სც/IgAIaIkI&v
სცნობ/INPN
სცხოვრობ/IN&v
სწორ/IG
სწყ/Io&v
სხ/InBnankn
სჯი/INPN
ტენ/QN&v
ტირ/JNQN&v
ტოვებ/InPN
ტრიალ/IeIn
ტყ/Ig
უახლოვ/IIOI&v
უახლოვდებ/QN&v
უბე/NPNSNNIG
უბრუნ/IIInOnAnankn&v
უბრუნდებ/JnQnQN&v
უერთდებ/QN&v
უვარ/IC&v
უზამ/INPN
უკი/IW&v
უმზერ/IN&v
უნ/IN
უპირისპირ/InOEOn&v
ურიგ/IEAnbnkn&v
უფრთხილდებ/QN&v
უქცევ/IN&v
უყვარ/IN&v
უყურებ/INPN
უწყობ/IN&v
უჭვრეტ/IN&v
უხა/IX&v
უხვ/In
უხვდებ/Qn&v
ფიქრ/In&v
ფიქრობ/INPN
ფრინ/IG&v
ქადაგებ/IN&v
ღებულობ/INPN
ღელ/IA&v
ღონ/In
ყავ/IN
ყალიბდებ/QN&v
ყი/IIIG&v
ყოყმან/IE&v
ყუჩ/IG
შვრებ/JNQN&v
შინ/IE
შორ/IoIcIn
ჩან/IN
ჩერ/IEIG&v
ჩნ/IGIg
ჩუმ/IG
ჩქარ/IA
ჩქარობ/INPN
ც/IAIEIG&v
ცდებ/QN&v
ცდილობ/INPN
ცვივ/QN&v
ცხად/Ig
ცხოვრობ/INPN
ძებნი/Io&v
ძლიერ/IG
ძრწუნ/IE&v
წესრიგ/Io&v
წვ/ICowonBEaEkE&v
წვებ/Qn&v
წყ/Io
წყნარ/In
ხ/IWIN&v
ხა/NSNNIoIG
ხარჯავ/INPnPN
ხე/NPNSNNIIIEIGIXIn
ხვ/IIIoIEIn
ჯ/In&v
ჯდებ/QN&v
ჯიუტ/IG
ჰგონებ/IN
ჰკი/Io&v
ჰყოფ/INPN
ჰხედვი/IN&v
ჰხვ/II&v
